Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB879.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 210.290 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet [for Health and Family Services ]may be appointed and act as executor,
administrator, guardian, limited guardian, conservator, or limited conservator as
provided in this section. In this capacity the cabinet may act as a fiduciary and
transact business in the same manner as any individual and for fiduciary purposes
may sue and be sued in any of the courts of the state. Bond shall not be required of
the cabinet.
(2) (a) Whenever a resident of the state is adjudged partially disabled or disabled and
no other suitable person or entity is available and willing to act as limited
guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator, the cabinet may be
appointed as the resident's limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or
conservator. As used in this paragraph, "resident of the state" means an
individual who has a permanent, full-time residence in Kentucky prior to the
filing of a petition for or appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited
conservator, or conservator for at least the previous six (6) months that is not
a hospital, treatment facility, correctional facility, or long-term care facility,
and who is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, except upon written order of
the court in exceptional circumstances, the cabinet shall not be appointed as a
limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator of a partially
disabled or disabled person when the person:
1. Has been convicted of, pled guilty to, or entered an Alford plea for a sex
crime as defined in KRS 17.500 or an offense that would classify the
person as a violent offender under KRS 439.3401; or
2. Is not alive or cannot be physically located.
Page 1 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
(c) Before appointing the cabinet, consideration shall be given to the average
caseload of each field social worker.
(d) The cabinet, acting through its designated officer, may apply to the District
Court of the county in which the adjudication is made for appointment as
limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator for a partially
disabled or disabled person who meets the requirements of this subsection.
(3) When the cabinet is appointed as a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator,
or conservator of a partially disabled or disabled person, the cabinet shall not:
(a) Assume physical custody of the person;
(b) Be assigned as the person's caregiver or custodian; or
(c) Become personally liable for the person's expenses or placement, or to third
parties for the person's actions. However, the cabinet shall procure resources
and services for which the person is eligible when necessary and available.
(4) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, upon the death of a
person for whom the cabinet has been appointed guardian, limited guardian,
conservator, or limited conservator, or upon the death of a person who has
been committed to the cabinet leaving an estate and having no relatives at the
time residing within the state, the cabinet may apply for appointment as
administrator and upon appointment shall close the administration of the
estate.
(b) If a person for whom the cabinet has been appointed guardian, limited
guardian, conservator, or limited conservator dies with less than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) of personal property or money, the cabinet shall not be
required to apply for appointment as administrator. However, prior to the
release of funds to the person's estate, the cabinet shall ensure all outstanding
bills related to living expenses, reasonable funeral expenses when not prepaid,
and estate recovery are paid. Any funds that remain after those expenses are
Page 2 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
paid may be released first to other creditors and then to the relatives of the
person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward]. The cabinet shall
establish an online registry to provide public notice of remaining funds to
other creditors and relatives of the person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[ward], and the process for claiming those funds.
Notwithstanding KRS 393.020, if the funds of a person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship[ward] are less than ten thousand dollars
($10,000) and remain unclaimed after the expiration of one (1) year from the
date public notice is made, the funds shall escheat to the guardianship trust
fund established in subsection (5) of this section.
(5) There is created in the cabinet a trust and agency fund to be known as the
guardianship trust fund. The trust shall consist of funds of deceased persons subject
to guardianship or conservatorship[wards] that remain after living, funeral, and
estate recovery expenses are paid and that are unclaimed for one (1) year after
public notice is made. The trust may also receive donations or grant funds for the
support of indigent persons subject to guardianship or conservatorship[wards].
Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any unused trust balance at the close of the fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year. Any interest
earnings of the trust shall become part of the trust and shall not lapse. The trust may
make investments as authorized by subsection (7) of this section and may use funds
in the trust for the benefit of indigent persons subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[wards] for expenses including:
(a) Temporary housing costs;
(b) Medical supplies or transportation services not covered by Medicaid;
(c) Emergency personal needs, including clothing or food;
(d) Burial expenses if no county funds are available in the county of death; and
(e) Expenses necessary to ensure health, safety, and well-being when no other
Page 3 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
funds are available or accessible in a timely manner.
(6) The cabinet shall make available an annual report of income and expenditures from
the guardianship trust fund. The trust shall be subject to an independent audit at the
request of the General Assembly or the State Auditor.
(7) The cabinet may invest funds held as fiduciary in bonds or other securities
guaranteed by the United States, and may sell or exchange such securities in its
discretion. In addition, the cabinet may establish or place funds held as fiduciary in
a trust.
(8) The cabinet shall receive such fees for its fiduciary services as provided by law.
These fees shall be placed in a trust and agency account, from which may be drawn
expenses for filing fees, court costs, and other expenses incurred in the
administration of estates. Claims of the cabinet against the estates shall be
considered in the same manner as any other claim.
(9) An officer designated by the secretary may act as legal counsel for any patient in a
state mental hospital or institution against whom a suit of any nature has been filed,
without being appointed as guardian, limited guardian, conservator, or limited
conservator.
(10) Patients hospitalized pursuant to KRS Chapters 202A and 202B who are not
adjudged disabled or partially disabled may authorize the cabinet [for Health and
Family Services ]to handle personal funds received by them at the hospital in the
same manner as prescribed in subsections (7) and (8) of this section.
Section 2. KRS 216B.303 is amended to read as follows:
Every resident in a boarding home[,] as defined in KRS 216B.300[,] shall have at least
the following rights:
(1) Before entering a boarding home, the resident or the resident's guardian, if any,
shall be fully informed in writing, as evidenced by the resident's written
acknowledgment or that of the resident's guardian, of all services provided by the
Page 4 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
boarding home and all applicable charges.
(2) Before entering a boarding home, the resident or the resident's guardian shall be
fully informed in writing, as evidenced by the resident's written acknowledgment or
that of the resident's guardian, of all the resident's rights as defined in this section,
and a list of any rules established by the boarding home.
(3) All residents shall be allowed to exercise their rights as a resident and a citizen, and
may voice grievances and recommend changes in policies and services to the
boarding home operator and to outside representatives of their choice, free from
restraint, interference, coercion, discrimination, or reprisal.
(4) All residents shall be free from mental and physical abuse.
(5) Each resident may manage the use of his or her personal funds. The boarding home
operator shall not require a resident to designate the operator as payee for any
benefits received by the resident. However, if the operator accepts the responsibility
for managing the resident's personal funds as evidenced by the operator's written
acknowledgment, proper accounting and monitoring of such funds shall be made.
This shall include the operator giving quarterly itemized statements to the resident
or the resident's guardian which detail the status of the resident's personal funds and
any transactions in which such funds have been received or disbursed. The operator
shall return to the resident his or her valuables, personal possessions, and any
unused balance of moneys from his or her account at the time the resident leaves
the boarding home.
(6) Residents shall not be required to perform services for the boarding home.
(7) Residents may associate and communicate privately with persons of their choice,
within reasonable hours established by the boarding home, and send and receive
personal mail unopened.
(8) A[No] resident shall not be detained against the resident's will. Residents shall be
permitted and encouraged to go outdoors and leave the premises as they wish.
Page 5 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
(9) Residents shall be permitted to participate in activities of social, religious, and
community groups at their discretion.
(10) Residents shall be assured of at least visual privacy in multibed rooms and in
bathrooms.
(11) If the resident has been adjudicated wholly mentally disabled in both financial and
personal affairs in accordance with KRS 387.590, the resident's guardian shall not
place the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] in a boarding
home.
(12) Each resident shall be treated with consideration, respect, and full recognition of his
or her dignity and individuality.
(13) Residents shall have access to a telephone at a convenient location within the
boarding home for making and receiving telephone calls subject to reasonable rules
established by the boarding home.
(14) Residents have the right to have private meetings with inspectors representing the
cabinet[ for Health and Family Services].
(15) Each resident and his or her guardian has the right to have access to all inspection
reports on the boarding home.
Section 3. KRS 387.510 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 387.500 to 387.770 and 387.990:
(1) "Conservator" means an individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the court
to manage the financial resources of a disabled person;
(2) "Limited conservator" means an individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the
court to assist in managing the financial resources of a partially disabled person and
whose powers and duties have been specifically enumerated by court order, and
includes any limited conservator appointed by the court on an emergency basis in
accordance with Section 16 of this Act;
(3) "Guardian" means any individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the court to
Page 6 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
manage the personal affairs of a disabled person;
(4) "Limited guardian" means an individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the
court to assist in managing the personal affairs of a partially disabled person and
whose powers and duties have been specifically enumerated by court order, and
includes any limited guardian appointed by the court on an emergency basis in
accordance with Section 16 of this Act;
(5) "Standby" guardian or conservator means a person or entity designated by the court
to assume the powers and duties assigned to a limited guardian, guardian, limited
conservator, or conservator upon his or her death, resignation, removal, or
incapacity;
(6) "Testamentary" guardian or conservator means an individual, agency, or
corporation nominated in the will of a limited guardian, guardian, limited
conservator, or conservator to succeed the testator in that capacity upon his or her
death;
(7) "Developmental disability" means a severe, chronic disability of a person which:
(a) Is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination of mental
and physical impairments, including pervasive developmental disorder;
(b) Is manifested before the person attains age twenty-two (22);
(c) Is likely to continue indefinitely;
(d) Results in substantial functional limitations in three (3) or more of the
following areas of major life activity:
1. Self-care;
2. Receptive and expressive language;
3. Learning;
4. Mobility;
5. Self-direction;
6. Capacity for independent living; and
Page 7 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
7. Economic self-sufficiency; and
(e) Reflects the person's need for a combination and sequence of special
interdisciplinary or generic care, treatment, or other services which are of
lifelong or extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated;
(8) "Disabled" means a legal disability, not a medical disability, and is measured by
functional inabilities. It refers to any person seventeen (17) years of age or older
who is:
(a) Unable to make informed decisions with respect to his or her personal affairs
to such an extent that he or she lacks the capacity to provide for his or her
physical health and safety, including but not limited to health care, food,
shelter, clothing, or personal hygiene; or
(b) Unable to make informed decisions with respect to his or her financial
resources to such an extent that he or she lacks the capacity to manage his or
her property effectively by those actions necessary to obtain, administer, and
dispose of both real and personal property.
Such inability shall be evidenced by acts or occurrences within six (6) months prior
to the filing of the petition for guardianship or conservatorship and shall not be
evidenced solely by isolated instances of negligence, improvidence, or other
behavior;
(9) "Partially disabled" refers to an individual who lacks the capacity to manage some
of his or her personal affairs [and/]or financial resources as provided in subsection
(8) of this section, but who cannot be found to be fully disabled as provided therein;
(10) "Mentally ill person" means a person with substantially impaired capacity to use
self-control, judgment, or discretion in the conduct of his or her affairs and social
relations, associated with maladaptive behavior or recognized emotional symptoms
where impaired capacity, maladaptive behavior, or emotional symptoms can be
related to physiological, psychological, or social factors;
Page 8 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
(11) "Interdisciplinary evaluation report" means a report of an evaluation of a respondent
performed pursuant to the provisions of KRS 387.540 to determine whether he or
she is partially disabled or disabled as defined in this section[herein];
(12) "Interested person or entity" means an adult relative or friend of the respondent or
person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward], an official or
representative of a public or private agency, corporation, or association concerned
with that person's welfare, or any other person found suitable by the court;
(13) "Petitioner" means a person who institutes a proceeding under KRS 387.530;
(14) "Respondent" means an individual alleged to be a partially disabled or disabled
person;
(15) "Person subject to guardianship or conservatorship"["Ward"] means a person for
whom a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator has been
appointed;
(16) "Committee" means a person appointed by the court prior to July 1, 1982, to have
full care, custody, and control of a disabled person and his or her estate; and
(17) "Personal affairs" means decisions regarding the person of an adult, including but
not limited to health care, food, shelter, clothing, or personal hygiene.
Section 4. KRS 387.520 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The District Courts shall have exclusive jurisdiction over all proceedings involving
a determination of partial disability or disability, the modification of orders, the
appointment and removal of guardians and conservators, and the management and
settlement of their accounts.
(2) (a) If the respondent or person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward]
is a resident of this state, the venue for all proceedings under KRS 387.500 to
387.770 shall be:
1.[(a)] In the county where the respondent or person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship[ward] resides;
Page 9 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
2.[(b)] In the county of domicile of the respondent or person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship[ward]; or
3.[(c)] In the county where the parent of the respondent or person subject
to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] is domiciled if the
respondent or person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward]
is a minor.
(b) This subsection[Nothing in This section] shall not preclude transfer of venue
for good cause shown.
(3) If a[no] local conservator has not been appointed and a[no] petition in a disability
proceeding is not pending in this state, a domiciliary foreign conservator may file
with a court in this state in a county in which property belonging to the disabled
person is located, authenticated copies of his or her appointment and of any official
bond he or she has given. Thereafter, he or she may exercise as to assets in this state
all powers of a local conservator and may maintain actions and proceedings in this
state subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties generally.
(4) This section shall be subordinate to KRS 387.810 to 387.854 to the extent that those
sections govern jurisdiction between Kentucky and other states.
Section 5. KRS 387.530 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A petition for a determination of partial disability or disability and the appointment
of a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator may be filed by
any interested person or by an individual needing guardianship or conservatorship.
The petition shall set forth the following:
(a) The name and address of the respondent;
(b) The date of birth of the respondent, if known;
(c) The nature and degree of the alleged disability of the respondent;
(d) The facts and reasons supporting the need for guardianship or
conservatorship;
Page 10 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
(e) A description and approximation of the value of the respondent's financial
resources, including government benefits, insurance entitlements, and
anticipated yearly income, if known;
(f) The names and addresses of the respondent's next of kin, if known;
(g) The name and address of the individual or facility, if any, having custody of
the respondent;
(h) The name, address, and interest of the petitioner;
(i) The name and address of the petitioner's attorney, if any; and
(j) The name and address of any person or entity appointed by the respondent as
respondent's attorney in fact under a durable power of attorney or as
respondent's surrogate to make health care decisions under an advance
directive.
(2) The petition shall be accompanied by a verified application of the person or entity
desiring appointment as limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or
conservator. The application shall state the name, address, and qualifications of the
applicant and his or her relationship to the respondent. If it is proposed that a
standby limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator be
designated, the petition shall also be accompanied by the application of the person
or entity desiring to be so designated. Additional petitions may be filed prior to the
date of the hearing by other persons desiring appointment.
Section 6. KRS 387.590 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) If the respondent is found partially disabled in managing his or her personal
affairs, but not partially disabled or disabled in managing his or her financial
resources, a limited guardian shall be appointed.
(b) If the respondent is found partially disabled in managing his or her financial
resources, but not partially disabled or disabled in managing his or her
personal affairs, a limited conservator shall be appointed.
Page 11 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
(c) If the respondent is found partially disabled in managing both his or her
personal affairs and financial resources, a limited guardian and a limited
conservator shall be appointed. The limited guardian and the limited
conservator may be the same individual, agency, or corporation.
(2) (a) If the respondent is found disabled in managing his or her personal affairs,
but not partially disabled or disabled in managing his or her financial
resources, a guardian shall be appointed.
(b) If the respondent is found disabled in managing his or her financial resources,
but not partially disabled or disabled in managing his or her personal affairs, a
conservator shall be appointed.
(c) If the respondent is found disabled in managing both his or her personal
affairs and his or her financial resources, a guardian and a conservator shall
be appointed. The guardian and the conservator may be the same individual,
agency, or corporation.
(3) The order of appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or
conservator shall specify:
(a) The type of guardianship, conservatorship, or guardianship and
conservatorship to which the person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[ward] is subject;
(b) The name and address of the limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator,
or conservator;
(c) The name and address of the standby guardian or conservator, if a standby
guardian or conservator is designated;
(d) The specific legal disabilities to which the respondent is subject, if the
respondent has been determined to be partially disabled;
(e) The corresponding powers and duties of the limited guardian or limited
conservator, if the respondent has been determined to be partially disabled;
Page 12 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
and
(f) The duration of the term of guardianship or conservatorship.
(4) A limited guardian or limited conservator shall not be appointed for a term greater
than five (5) years and may be appointed for a lesser period. A guardian or
conservator may be appointed for a period of unlimited duration.
(5) The judgment of partial disability or disability and the order of appointment shall be
filed in the District Court. The judgment shall be indexed by the county clerk in the
book in which notices of actions and encumbrances are indexed. Unless such
judgment is filed and indexed, it shall not constitute notice to any subsequent bona
fide purchaser for value, mortgagee, or encumbrancer.
(6) If the respondent is determined to be disabled or partially disabled but no limited
guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator is appointed at the hearing,
the determination shall have no legal effect.
(7) The rights of which a person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] is
legally deprived upon a determination of disability in managing his or her personal
affairs and financial resources include but are not limited to the right to:
(a) [The right to ]Dispose of property;[,]
(b) Execute instruments;[,]
(c) Enter into contractual relationships;[,]
(d) Determine his or her living arrangements;[,]
(e) Consent to medical procedures;[,] and
(f) Obtain a motor vehicle operator's license.
(8) A person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] shall only be deprived
of the right to vote if the court separately and specifically makes a finding on the
record as established in KRS 387.580(3)(c).
(9)[(8)] A partially disabled or disabled person for whom a limited guardian, limited
conservator, or conservator has been appointed retains all legal and civil rights
Page 13 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
except those which have by court order been designated as legal disabilities or
which have been specifically granted to the limited guardian, limited conservator,
or conservator. A person who is partially disabled may be subject to some but not
all of the disabilities specified in subsection (7) of this section.
Section 7. KRS 387.620 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A partially disabled or disabled person, his or her limited guardian, guardian,
limited conservator, or conservator, or any other interested person may petition the
court for:
(a) Termination or modification of an order of partial disability or disability;
(b) Removal, [and/or ]replacement, or removal and replacement of a limited
guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator; or
(c) Renewal of the appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited
conservator, or conservator.
(2) Petitions pursuant to this section shall set forth:
(a) The name and address of the person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[ward];
(b) The name and address of the limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator,
or conservator;
(c) The name, address, and interest of the petitioner;
(d) The names and addresses of the[ ward's] next of kin of the person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship, if known;
(e) The name and address of the individual or facility, if any, having custody of
the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward];
(f) The relief requested; and
(g) The facts and reasons supporting the request.
(3) A request under subsection (1) of this section, if made by the person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship[ward], may be communicated to the court by any
Page 14 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
means, including[,] but not limited to[,] oral communication or informal letter. If
such a request is communicated by means other than a petition, the court shall
appoint a suitable person who may[,] but need not be[,] an employee of the state,
county, or court to prepare a written petition to be filed with the court within seven
(7) days following the appointment.
(4) Within thirty (30) days after the filing of a petition, the court shall conduct a
hearing at which the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward]
shall be entitled to counsel. The time for a hearing may be extended by the court, on
motion of either party, for cause. Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall
be given by the clerk of the court not less than fourteen (14) days prior to the
hearing to both parties and all persons named in the petition. The petitioner shall,
upon his or her motion, be entitled to have the motion for termination or
modification determined by a jury.
(5) At the request of any party or on its own initiative, the court may order an
interdisciplinary evaluation of the person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[ward]. The time period in which the court must review a petition
may be extended for an appropriate period of time if an evaluation is ordered by the
court. The interdisciplinary evaluation report may be filed as a single or joint report
of the interdisciplinary evaluation team, or it may otherwise be constituted by the
separate reports filed by each individual of the team. If the court and all parties to
the proceeding and their attorneys agree to the admissibility of the report or reports,
the report or reports shall be admitted into evidence and shall be considered by the
court.
(6) Upon conclusion of a modification hearing without a jury, the court shall enter a
written order setting forth the factual basis for its finding and may do any of the
following:
(a) Dismiss the petition;
Page 15 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
(b) Remove the guardian or conservator and dissolve the guardianship or
conservatorship order;
(c) Remove the limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator
and appoint a successor;
(d) Modify the original guardianship or conservatorship order; or
(e) Make any other order which the court deems appropriate and in the best
interest of the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward].
(7) If the original order is dissolved and no further order is issued, the person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship[ward] shall be relieved of all legal disabilities.
The court shall enter an order and judgment restoring to the person all of the rights
and privileges of a citizen. The clerk shall note the judgment or modification in the
book in which notices of actions and encumbrances are indexed.
(8) The clerk of the court shall transmit a certified copy of the restoration judgment or
modification to the originating court, if the judgment or modification is ordered by
a court other than the court in which the original judgment was entered.
Section 8. KRS 387.640 is amended to read as follows:
It shall be the general duty of the limited guardian or guardian to carry out diligently and
in good faith the specific duties and powers assigned by the court and to:
(1) Ensure[Assure] that the personal, civil, and human rights of the person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship[ward] are protected; and
(2) Encourage the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] to:
(a) Participate to the maximum extent of his or her abilities in all decisions which
affect him or her;
(b) Act in his or her own behalf on all matters in which he or she is able to do so;
and
(c) Develop or regain, to the maximum extent possible, his or her capacity to
meet the essential requirements for his or her physical health or safety, and, if
Page 16 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
impaired, his or her capacity to manage his or her financial resources.
Section 9. KRS 387.650 is amended to read as follows:
The court may assign to a limited guardian any portion of the powers and duties specified
in KRS 387.660. The court may assign other duties as are necessary to enhance the
[ward's ]safety and well-being of the person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[well being]. A limited guardian shall comply with the reporting
requirements specified by KRS 387.670 which pertain to his or her powers and duties as
specified by the court, provided that all reports submitted shall include the information
required by paragraphs (d) and (f) of KRS 387.670(1).
Section 10. KRS 387.660 is amended to read as follows:
A guardian of a disabled person shall have the following powers and duties, except as
modified by order of the court:
(1) To establish the [ward's ]place of abode for the person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship within the state, except that, if at any time a guardian places a
person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] in a licensed residential
facility for developmentally disabled persons, the guardian shall, within thirty (30)
days of such placement, file with the court notice of the placement, stating with
specificity the reasons for such placement, and an interdisciplinary evaluation
report detailing the social, psychological, medical or other considerations on which
such placement is predicated, a description of the treatment or habilitation programs
which will benefit the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] as
a result of such placement, and a determination that such placement will provide
appropriate treatment in the least restrictive available treatment and residential
program. For purposes of this subsection, the interdisciplinary evaluation report
may be one performed within two (2) months prior to the placement for purposes of
determining whether such placement is necessary and appropriate, or may be an
evaluation and assessment provided by the residential facility immediately after
Page 17 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
placement. Notice to the court shall not be required where the person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship[ward] is transferred from one licensed residential
facility to another;
(2) To make provision for the [ward's ]care, comfort, and maintenance of the person
subject to guardianship or conservatorship, and arrange for such educational,
social, vocational, and rehabilitation services as are appropriate and as will assist
the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] in the development
of maximum self-reliance and independence;
(3) To give any necessary consent or approval to enable the person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship[ward] to receive medical or other professional
care, counsel, treatment or service, except that a guardian may not consent on
behalf of a person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] to an
abortion, sterilization, psychosurgery, removal of a bodily organ, or amputation of a
limb unless the procedure is first approved by order of the court or is necessary, in
an emergency situation, to preserve the life or prevent serious impairment of the
physical health of the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward];
(4) To act with respect to the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward]
in a manner which limits the deprivation of civil rights and restricts his or her
personal freedom only to the extent necessary to provide needed care and services
to him or her; and
(5) To expend sums from the financial resources of the person subject to guardianship
or conservatorship[ward] reasonable and necessary to carry out the powers and
duties assigned to him or her by the court.
If a separate limited conservator or conservator has been appointed for the person subject
to guardianship or conservatorship[ward], the expenditure of funds by the limited
guardian shall be consistent with the duties assigned to and procedures and policies
established by such limited conservator or conservator. Conflicts arising between a
Page 18 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
limited guardian and a limited conservator or conservator regarding the expenditure of
funds which are unable to be otherwise resolved shall be submitted to the court for
resolution.
Section 11. KRS 387.670 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A guardian shall file with the court at least annually a verified report stating:
(a) The [ward's ]current mental, physical, and social condition of the person
subject to guardianship or conservatorship;
(b) The address of every residence of the person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[ward] during the reporting period and length of stay at each
residence;
(c) A summary of the medical, social, educational, vocational, and other
professional services received by the person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[ward] during the reporting period;
(d) An outline of the guardian's visits with and activities on behalf of the person
subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward];
(e) A recommendation as to the need for continued guardianship;
(f) A statement signed by the standby guardian, if one has been appointed, that
the standby guardian continues to be willing to serve in the event of the death,
resignation, removal, or incapacity of the guardian; and
(g) Other information requested by the court or useful in the opinion of the
guardian.
(2) For the purpose of filing the report required by subsection (1) of this section, the
guardian shall be given access to records pertaining to the person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship[ward] held by public or private agencies which
contain information necessary for the guardian to perform his or her duties.
(3) The court shall review the report required in subsection (1) of this section and take
whatever action it considers necessary to enhance the well-being of the person
Page 19 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward].
Section 12. KRS 387.680 is amended to read as follows:
It shall be the general duty of the limited conservator or conservator to carry out[,]
diligently and in good faith[,] the specific duties and powers assigned by the court and to:
(1) Manage or assist in managing those financial resources placed under his or her
supervision [and/]or control as would a prudent person managing his or her own
resources, including establishing or placing resources in a trust, and, if a
conservator has special skills or is named conservator on the basis of
representations of special skills or expertise, he or she shall use those skills; and
(2) Encourage the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] to:
(a) Participate, to the maximum extent of his or her abilities, in all decisions
which affect him or her;
(b) Act on his or her own behalf on all matters in which he or she is able to do
so; and
(c) Develop or regain, to the maximum extent possible, his or her capacity to
manage his or her financial resources and, if impaired, his or her capacity to
meet the essential requirements for his or her physical health or safety.
Section 13. KRS 387.690 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A limited conservator or conservator shall expend or distribute, or authorize the
expenditure or distribution of, or assist in the expenditure or distribution of, the
principal or income from the financial resources placed under his or her supervision
and control to ensure[assure] that:
(a) The essential requirements for the physical health or safety of the person
subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] are met;
(b) The rights of the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward]
are protected;
(c) The financial resources of the person subject to guardianship or
Page 20 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
conservatorship[ward] which are subject to the conservatorship are prudently
managed;
(d) The person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] has the
opportunity to develop or regain the capacity to perform the functions listed in
paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (2) of KRS 387.680; and
(e) The limited guardian or guardian for the person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[ward], if any, is able to carry out the duties and powers
assigned to him or her by the court.
(2) In performing his or her duties, the limited conservator or conservator shall
consider:
(a) The size of the financial resources under the limited conservator's or
conservator's supervision or control;
(b) The probable duration of the conservatorship;
(c) The likelihood that the person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[ward] may be able to manage his or her financial resources
in the future;
(d) The accustomed standard of living of the person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[ward];
(e) Other funds or resources used for the support of the person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship[ward] which have not been placed under
the control or supervision of the limited conservator or conservator; and
(f) The requests of the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward]
and the request of the[ward's] limited guardian or guardian of the person
subject to guardianship or conservatorship, if any.
(3) In addition to the duties and powers listed in subsection (1) of this section, the court
may assign to a limited conservator any of the duties and powers listed in KRS
387.700 which the partially disabled person lacks the ability to perform.
Page 21 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
Section 14. KRS 387.700 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A conservator has all of the powers conferred herein and any additional powers
conferred by law on trustees in this state. The conservator may take possession of
the [ward's ]real and personal property belonging to the person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship, and of all rents, incomes, and benefits therefrom,
whether accruing before or after his or her appointment, and of the proceeds arising
from the sale, mortgage, lease or exchange thereof. Subject to such possession the
title of all such estate and to the increment and proceeds thereof shall be to the
person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] and not to the
conservator. It is the duty of the conservator to protect and preserve the estate, to
retain, sell and invest it as hereinafter provided, prosecute or defend actions, claims
or proceedings in any jurisdiction for the protection of the estate's assets, to account
for it faithfully, to perform all other duties required of him or her by law, and, at the
termination of the conservatorship, to deliver the assets of the person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship[ward] to the persons lawfully entitled thereto.
(2) The conservator shall apply the money and property for the payments of debts,
taxes, claims, charges and expenses of the conservatorship and for the support, care,
maintenance and education of the person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[ward] or his or her dependents.
(3) Any sale of realty of a person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward]
shall be as provided in KRS Chapter 389A.
(4) Any lease of mineral rights, oil and gas rights, or sale of timber owned by a person
subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward], or consolidation agreement, as
defined by KRS 353.220, to be made on behalf of a person subject to guardianship
or conservatorship[ward] by a conservator shall require the authorization and order
of the District Court of the county where the conservator has qualified. Such order
may be given only pursuant to written motion which contains the grounds for the
Page 22 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
motion and a description of the lease or agreement involved.
Section 15. KRS 387.710 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Within sixty (60) days of appointment, the limited conservator or conservator shall
file with the court a verified inventory of all the property of the person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship[ward] which has come to his or her possession or
knowledge, including a statement of all encumbrances, liens, and other secured
claims on any item, any claims against the estate of the person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship[ward], and any cause of action accruing to the
person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward]. The limited conservator
or conservator shall provide a copy thereof to the person subject to guardianship
or conservatorship[ward if he has sufficient mental capacity to understand it].
(2) (a) A limited conservator or conservator shall file with the court a verified report
and financial account annually[biennially] within one hundred twenty (120)
days after the anniversary date of his or her appointment, unless the limited
conservator or conservator is the Cabinet for Health and Family Services,
in which case the verified report and financial account shall be filed
biennially. The report shall contain:
1. The present personal status of the person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[ward] whose estate is managed by the conservator;
2. The limited conservator or conservator's plan for preserving and
maintaining the estate of which he or she has control or supervision;
3. The need for continuation or cessation of the conservatorship;[ and]
4. The need for any alteration in the powers of the conservatorship; and
5. If the limited conservator or conservator delegated a power to any
other person, a description of the power delegated and the reason for
the delegation.
(b) The biennial report shall specify the amount and type of real and personal
Page 23 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
property received by the limited conservator or conservator and remaining in
his or her control or invested by him or her, the nature of such investment,
and expenditures made during the preceding year. Upon request of the court,
the limited conservator or conservator shall produce for examination any
information or documentation which the court may consider relevant to the
accounting of the financial and property transactions of the estate.
(c) If the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] has no real
property and possesses personal property of two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500) or less[ for any year during the biennial report], the conservator or
limited conservator may file an informal biennial financial report attesting to
the identity of the [ward's ]financial account belonging to the person subject
to guardianship or conservatorship, and its current balance. If the balance
does not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500)[ for any year of
the biennial report], the conservator or limited conservator shall not be
required to render to the court a detailed accounting of the expenditures from
the fund, unless the court, on its own motion or that of any interested
person[party or individual], deems it necessary to order the conservator or
limited conservator to provide a detailed biennial accounting, including the
listing of all expenditures for that reporting period.
(3) Upon the resignation, removal, or death of a limited conservator or conservator, or
on the termination of the conservatorship, the limited conservator or conservator, or
his or her personal representative, shall [forthwith ]submit a final report and
account to the court and to the former person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[ward] and to the successor limited conservator or conservator, or,
if the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] is deceased, to his
or her personal representative, and shall pay over the trust estate to the person
entitled thereto. Upon approval of the report and account, the limited conservator or
Page 24 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
conservator shall be discharged and his or her surety, if any, released.
Section 16. KRS 387.740 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The court may exercise the powers of a limited guardian or limited conservator or
may appoint an individual or agency to exercise such powers before or during the
pendency of a proceeding for a determination of partial disability or disability or an
appeal therefrom, if it appears that there is danger of serious impairment to the
health or safety of the respondent or damage or dissipation to his or her property if
immediate action is not taken.
(2) Prior to a hearing on the need for an emergency appointment of a limited guardian
or limited conservator, a petition shall be filed by any person or entity which sets
forth the following:
(a) The name, age, and address of the respondent;
(b) The danger alleged to be imminent;
(c) The type of appointment and the protection and assistance requested;
(d) The facts and reasons supporting the request;
(e) The name, address, and qualifications of the proposed limited guardian or
limited conservator, if any;
(f) The name, address, and interest of the petitioner;
(g) The names and addresses of the respondent's next of kin, if known;
(h) The name and address of the individual or facility, if any, having custody of
the respondent; and
(i) The date of filing of the petition for determination of disability or partial
disability.
(3) (a) The court shall review any and all petitions for an emergency appointment of
a limited guardian or limited conservator without delay and not more than one
(1) week after the petition is filed. The circuit clerk in the county in which the
petition is filed shall accept all petitions and the Commonwealth shall not
Page 25 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
exclude any petition filed under this section from presentation to the court.
Within one (1) week of the filing of a petition pursuant to this section, the
court shall conduct a hearing at which the respondent shall be entitled to
counsel.
(b) Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given not less than forty-
eight (48) hours prior to the hearing to all persons named in the petition, the
petitioner, and the Commonwealth unless waived in writing or on the record.
(4) The Commonwealth shall present evidence at the hearing. The petitioner shall have
the right to present evidence in support of the petition at the hearing in addition to
any evidence presented by the Commonwealth, and shall have the right to cross-
examine witnesses.
(5) The burden shall be on the Commonwealth and the petitioner to prove by clear and
convincing evidence the need for the emergency appointment of a limited guardian
or conservator.
(6) If the court exercises the powers of a limited guardian or limited conservator or
appoints another to do so in an emergency situation as set forth in subsection (1) of
this section, the court shall state on the record findings of fact as to the danger
determined to be imminent, the sources relied on in arriving at such determination,
the type of assistance to be provided, and the powers and duties of the emergency
guardian or conservator. The authority of the guardian or conservator shall expire:
(a) Upon resolution of the appeal or action;
(b) Sixty (60) days after the court's finding under this subsection; or
(c) No more than sixty (60) days from the time period described in paragraph
(b) of this subsection if the court finds that the there is danger of serious
impairment to the health or safety of the respondent or damage or
dissipation to his or her property if the authority of the guardian or
conservator is not extended.
Page 26 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
Section 17. KRS 387.750 is amended to read as follows:
(1) On appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or
conservator, or at any time thereafter, the court may designate another suitable
person or entity to assume the powers and duties assigned to the limited guardian,
guardian, limited conservator, or conservator upon his or her death, resignation,
removal, or incapacity. Prior to such designation, the individual or entity to be
designated shall file with the court a written application stating the name, address,
and qualifications of the applicant and his or her relationship, if any, to the
respondent.
(2) The individual so designated shall file an acceptance with the court within ten (10)
days of the death, resignation, or incapacity of his or her predecessor. Notice shall
also be given to the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship[ward] and
his or her nearest adult relative. An individual serving on a standby basis may
exercise all the powers and duties assigned to his or her predecessor upon filing of
his or her acceptance unless otherwise ordered by the court.
(3) In an emergency situation and in the absence and unavailability of the initially
appointed guardian or conservator, the standby guardian or conservator may
temporarily assume the powers and duties of the initially appointed guardian or
conservator.
Section 18. KRS 387.760 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [No ]Court costs shall not be charged to a respondent or person subject to
guardianship or conservatorship[ward] in any proceeding under KRS 387.500 to
387.770, if the respondent or person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[ward] is a poor person as defined in KRS 453.190.
(2) Limited guardians, guardians, limited conservators, and conservators are entitled to
reasonable compensation for services rendered and to reimbursement for reasonable
and necessary expenses incurred in the exercise of their assigned guardianship or
Page 27 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2411
conservatorship duties and powers. Such compensation and reimbursement shall be
paid from the financial resources of the person subject to guardianship or
conservatorship[ward] and shall not exceed:
(a) A commission of not more than six percent (6%) of the income collected by
the fiduciary, payable at the time the income is collected; and
(b) Either, but not both, of the following, as elected by the fiduciary:
1. An annual commission of three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) of the fair
market value of the real and personal property in the care of the
fiduciary; or
2. An annual commission of not more than six percent (6%) of the fair
market value of the principal distributed by the fiduciary, payable at the
time the principal is distributed.
In the absence of an agreement to the contrary, a commission on income shall be
paid out of the income of the estate and a commission on principal shall be paid out
of the principal of the estate.
(3) Upon submitted proof showing that in the handling of the estate the fiduciary has
performed additional and necessary services which have been unusual or
extraordinary and not normally incident to the care and management of a similar
estate, the court may allow the fiduciary additional compensation as is fair and
reasonable for the additional services rendered.
Page 28 of 28
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:28 AM Jacketed